Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.703

Economic development programs.

It shall be in the public purpose for all cities to engage in economic development programs. In addition, cities may contract with nonprofit corporations in furtherance of this and other acts relating to economic development.

[ 1985 c 92 s 1.]